Nebraska, session 109, LB1202.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-497.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
60-497.01 (1) An abstract of the court record of every case in which
a person is convicted of violating any provision of the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, the
Nebraska Rules of the Road, or section 28-524 or 83-1,127.02, as from
time to time amended by the Legislature, or any traffic regulations in
city or village ordinances shall be transmitted within thirty days of
sentencing or other disposition by the court to the director. Any
abstract received by the director more than thirty days after the date of
sentencing or other disposition shall be reported by the director to the
State Court Administrator.
(2)(a) (2) Any person who violates violating section 28-306, 28-394,
28-1254, 60-696, 60-697, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, 60-6,213, or 60-6,214 while
who is placed on probation shall be assessed the same points under
section 60-4,182 as if such person were not placed on probation. This
subdivision does not apply to any person:
(i) Whom the unless a court has ordered to that such person shall
obtain an ignition interlock permit in order to operate a motor vehicle
with an ignition interlock device pursuant to section 60-6,211.05; and
(ii) Who presents sufficient evidence is presented to the department
that such a device is installed.
(b)(i) For any other violation, the director shall not assess such
person with any points under section 60-4,182 for such violation when the
person is placed on probation until the director is advised by the court
that such person previously placed on probation has violated the terms of
his or her probation and such probation has been revoked.
(ii) Upon receiving notice of revocation of probation, the director
shall assess to such person the points which such person would have been
assessed had the person not been placed on probation. All such points
shall be assessed as of the date of the violation.
-2-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
(iii) When a person fails to successfully complete probation, the
court shall notify the director immediately.
Sec. 2. Section 60-4,118.06, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-4,118.06 (1) A person may apply for an ignition interlock permit
by:
(a) Submitting to (1) Upon receipt by the director: of
(i) A (a) a certified copy of a court order issued pursuant to
section 60-6,211.05;
(ii) A , a certified copy of an order for installation of an
ignition interlock device and issuance of an ignition interlock permit
pursuant to section 60-6,197.03; ,
(iii) A or a copy of an order from the Board of Pardons pursuant to
section 83-1,127.02; , or
(iv) A beginning January 1, 2026, a certified copy of a court order
or administrative license revocation order from another jurisdiction that
substantially complies with sections 60-6,197.03 and 60-6,211.05 and
sufficient proof of residence in this state;
(b) Submitting to the director sufficient , (b) sufficient evidence
that the person has surrendered his or her operator's license to the
department and installed an approved ignition interlock device in
accordance with such order; , and
(c) Paying (c) payment of the fee provided in section 60-4,115 ,
such person may apply for an ignition interlock permit.
(2) A person subject to administrative license revocation under
sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 shall be eligible for an ignition
interlock permit as provided in such sections.
(3) The director shall issue an ignition interlock permit only for
the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock
device.
(4) All ignition interlock permits issued pursuant to this section
-3-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
subsection shall indicate that the permit is not valid for the operation
of any commercial motor vehicle.
(5) (2) Upon expiration of the revocation period or upon expiration
of an order issued by the Board of Pardons pursuant to section
83-1,127.02, a person may apply to the department in writing for issuance
of an operator's license. Regardless of whether the license surrendered
by such person under subsection (1) of this section has expired, the
person shall apply for a new operator's license pursuant to the Motor
Vehicle Operator's License Act.
(6) (3) An ignition interlock permit shall not be issued under this
section or sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 to any person except in cases
of a violation of subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306,
subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-394, or section 28-1254,
60-6,196, 60-6,197, 60-6,197.06, or 60-6,198 or section 6 of this act.
(7) (4) The director shall revoke a person's ignition interlock
permit issued under this section or sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 upon
receipt of an (a) abstract of conviction indicating that the person had
his or her operating privileges revoked or canceled or (b) administrative
order revoking or canceling the person's operating privileges, if such
conviction or order resulted from an incident other than the incident
which resulted in the application for the ignition interlock permit.
Sec. 3. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and sections 6 to 9 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 4. Section 60-6,211.05, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-6,211.05 (1) Pursuant to section If an order is granted under
section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 and sections 60-6,197.02 and 60-6,197.03 or
section 6 of this act, a the court may order that the defendant install
an ignition interlock device of a type approved by the Director of Motor
-4-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
Vehicles on each motor vehicle operated by the defendant during the
period of revocation. Upon sufficient evidence of installation, the
defendant may apply to the director for an ignition interlock permit
pursuant to section 60-4,118.06. The device shall, without tampering or
the intervention of another person, prevent the defendant from operating
the motor vehicle when the defendant has an alcohol concentration greater
than three-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one
hundred milliliters of his or her blood or three-hundredths of one gram
or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his or her
breath. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue an ignition
interlock permit to the defendant under section 60-4,118.06 only upon
sufficient proof that a defendant has installed an ignition interlock
device on any motor vehicle that the defendant will operate during his or
her release.
(2) If the court orders installation of an ignition interlock device
and issuance of an ignition interlock permit pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, the court may also order the use of a continuous alcohol
monitoring device and abstention from alcohol use at all times. The
device shall, without tampering or the intervention of another person,
test and record the alcohol consumption level of the defendant on a
periodic basis and transmit such information to probation authorities.
(3)(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, any order issued by the court
pursuant to this section shall not take effect until the defendant is
eligible to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (8) of section
60-498.01. A person shall be eligible to be issued an ignition interlock
permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device if he or she is not subject to any other suspension,
cancellation, required no-driving period, or period of revocation and has
successfully completed the ignition interlock permit application process.
The Department of Motor Vehicles shall review its records and the driving
record abstract of any person who applies for an ignition interlock
-5-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device to determine (i) the applicant's eligibility for an
ignition interlock permit, (ii) the applicant's previous convictions
under section 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or any previous
administrative license revocation, if any, and (iii) if the applicant is
subject to any required no-drive periods before the ignition interlock
permit may be issued.
(3) Any (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any order issued by the
court, or issued pursuant to a court order or administrative license
revocation order from another jurisdiction that substantially complies
with this section and section 60-6,197.03, shall not take effect until
the defendant is eligible to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to
subsection (8) of section 60-498.01. A person shall be eligible to be
issued an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device if he or she is not subject to
any other suspension, cancellation, required no-driving period, or period
of revocation and has successfully completed the ignition interlock
permit application process. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall,
before the ignition interlock permit may be issued, review its records
and the driving record abstract of any person who applies for an ignition
interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock device to determine (a) (i) the applicant's
eligibility for an ignition interlock permit, (b) (ii) the applicant's
previous convictions under section 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or
any previous administrative license revocation, if any, and (c) (iii) if
the applicant is subject to any required no-drive periods.
(4)(a) If the court orders an ignition interlock device or the Board
of Pardons orders an ignition interlock device under section 83-1,127.02,
the court or the Board of Pardons shall order the defendant to apply for
an ignition interlock permit as provided in section 60-4,118.06 which
indicates that the defendant is only allowed to operate a motor vehicle
-6-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
equipped with an ignition interlock device.
(b) Such court order shall remain in effect for a period of time as
determined by the court not to exceed the maximum term of revocation that
which the court could have imposed according to the nature of the
violation and shall allow operation by the defendant of only an ignition-
interlock-equipped motor vehicle.
(c) Such Board of Pardons order shall remain in effect for a period
of time not to exceed any period of revocation the applicant is subject
to at the time the application for a reprieve is made.
(5) Any person restricted to operating a motor vehicle equipped with
an ignition interlock device, pursuant to a Board of Pardons order, who
operates upon the highways of this state a motor vehicle without such
device or if the device has been disabled, bypassed, or altered in any
way, shall be punished as provided in subsection (3) of section
83-1,127.02.
(5) (6) If a person ordered to use a continuous alcohol monitoring
device and abstain from alcohol use pursuant to a court order as provided
in subsection (2) of this section violates the provisions of such court
order by removing, tampering with, or otherwise bypassing the continuous
alcohol monitoring device or by consuming alcohol while required to use
such device, he or she shall have his or her ignition interlock permit
revoked and be unable to apply for reinstatement for the duration of the
revocation period imposed by the court.
(6) (7) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations regarding the approval of ignition interlock devices, the
means of installing ignition interlock devices, and the means of
administering the ignition interlock permit program.
(7)(a) (8)(a) The costs incurred in order to comply with the
ignition interlock requirements of this section shall be paid directly to
the ignition interlock provider by the person complying with an order for
an ignition interlock permit and installation of an ignition interlock
-7-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
device.
(b) If the Department of Motor Vehicles has determined the person to
be indigent and incapable of paying for the cost of installation,
removal, or maintenance of the ignition interlock device in accordance
with this section, such costs shall be paid out of the Department of
Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund if such funds are available,
according to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
department. Such costs shall also be paid out of the Department of Motor
Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund if such funds are available and if the
court or the Board of Pardons, whichever is applicable, has determined
the person to be indigent and incapable of paying for the cost of
installation, removal, or maintenance of the ignition interlock device in
accordance with this section. The Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund is created. Money in the Department of Motor Vehicles
Ignition Interlock Fund may be used for transfers to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. On October 1, 2017, or as soon
thereafter as administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall
transfer twenty-five thousand dollars from the Department of Motor
Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund to the Violence Prevention Cash Fund. On
October 1, 2018, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible, the
State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five thousand dollars from the
Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund to the Violence
Prevention Cash Fund. Any money in the Department of Motor Vehicles
Ignition Interlock Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(9)(a)(i) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the
appropriate district probation office or the appropriate court, as
applicable, of any evidence of tampering with or circumvention of an
ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, when the facility
becomes aware of such evidence. Failure of the facility to provide
-8-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
notification as provided in this subdivision is a Class V misdemeanor.
(ii) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the
Department of Motor Vehicles, if the ignition interlock permit is issued
pursuant to sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04, of any evidence of tampering
with or circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to
do so, when the facility becomes aware of such evidence. Failure of the
facility to provide notification as provided in this subdivision is a
Class V misdemeanor.
(b) If a district probation office receives evidence of tampering
with or circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to
do so, from an ignition interlock service facility, the district
probation office shall notify the appropriate court of such violation.
The court shall immediately schedule an evidentiary hearing to be held
within fourteen days after receiving such evidence, either from the
district probation office or an ignition interlock service facility, and
the court shall cause notice of the hearing to be given to the person
operating a motor vehicle pursuant to an order under subsection (1) of
this section. If the person who is the subject of such evidence does not
appear at the hearing and show cause why the order made pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section should remain in effect, the court shall
rescind the original order. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to an
order made by the Board of Pardons pursuant to section 83-1,127.02.
(8) (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the issuance of
an ignition interlock permit by the Department of Motor Vehicles under
section 60-498.01 or an order for the installation of an ignition
interlock device and ignition interlock permit made pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section as part of a conviction, as well as the
administration of such court order by the Office of Probation
Administration for the installation, maintenance, and removal of such
device, as applicable, shall not be construed to create an order of
probation when an order of probation has not been issued.
-9-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
Sec. 5. Section 60-6,211.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,211.11 (1) A person ordered by the Department of Motor Vehicles
to operate only motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device
shall not, while such order is in effect, operate a motor vehicle:
(a) That is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(b) That is equipped with an ignition interlock device that has been
disabled, bypassed, or altered in any way; or
(c) Without obtaining an ignition interlock permit.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, a
violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class IV
felony if the person:
(i) Operated such motor vehicle while such person had a
concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol
per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood or a concentration of
two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of his or her breath; or
(ii) Refused a chemical test of his or her blood, breath, or urine.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person
ordered by a court or the Department of Motor Vehicles to operate only
motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device is guilty of a
Class I misdemeanor if he or she (a) tampers with or circumvents and then
operates a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device
installed under the court order or Department of Motor Vehicles order
while the order is in effect or (b) operates a motor vehicle which is not
equipped with an ignition interlock device in violation of the court
order or Department of Motor Vehicles order.
(2) Any person ordered by a court or the Department of Motor
Vehicles to operate only motor vehicles equipped with an ignition
interlock device is guilty of a Class IV felony if he or she (a)(i)
-10-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
tampers with or circumvents and then operates a motor vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device installed under the court order or
Department of Motor Vehicles order while the order is in effect or (ii)
operates a motor vehicle which is not equipped with an ignition interlock
device in violation of the court order or Department of Motor Vehicles
order and (b) operates the motor vehicle as described in subdivision (a)
(i) or (ii) of this subsection when he or she has a concentration of two-
hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of his or her blood or a concentration of two-hundredths of
one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his
or her breath.
(3) Any person who otherwise operates a motor vehicle equipped with
an ignition interlock device in violation of the requirements of the
court order or Department of Motor Vehicles order under which the device
was installed shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who has applied for and received a 24/7 sobriety
program permit and operates a motor vehicle when the person has a
concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol
per one hundred milliliters of the person's blood or a concentration of
two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of the person's breath, or who refuses a chemical test, shall
be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. (1) For purposes of this section, active revocation order
means a court order to operate only motor vehicles equipped with an
ignition interlock device, which order was in effect during the most
recent violation of this section. In the event of multiple orders, such
order shall be the longest of any such orders.
(2) A person ordered by a court to operate only motor vehicles
equipped with an ignition interlock device shall not, while such order is
in effect, operate a motor vehicle:
(a) That is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;
-11-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
(b) That is equipped with an ignition interlock device that has been
disabled, bypassed, or altered in any way; or
(c) Without obtaining an ignition interlock permit.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, a
violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class IV
felony if the person:
(i) Operated such motor vehicle while such person had a
concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol
per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood or a concentration of
two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of his or her breath; or
(ii) Refused a chemical test of his or her blood, breath, or urine.
(4)(a) For a first violation of subsection (2) of this section, the
court shall, as a part of the judgment of conviction, order that the
revocation of such person's operator's license be extended for a period
of ninety days. Such extension shall begin on a date selected by the
court.
(b)(i) For a second or subsequent violation of this section, the
court shall, as a part of the judgment of conviction, order that either:
(A) The active revocation order be restarted, with such revocation
period to begin on the date of sentencing; or
(B) The revocation of such person's operator's license be extended
for a period of one year from a date selected by the court.
(ii) The court shall select the option provided in subdivision (4)
(b) of this section that results in a longer revocation period.
(c) A revocation order issued under this subsection shall require
that the person apply for an ignition interlock permit pursuant to
section 60-6,211.05 for the revocation period and have an ignition
interlock device installed on any motor vehicle he or she operates during
the revocation period.
-12-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
(5) Any person who otherwise operates a motor vehicle equipped with
an ignition interlock device in violation of the requirements of the
court order under which the device was installed shall be guilty of a
Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. (1) If an ignition interlock service facility becomes aware
of any evidence that a person has disabled, bypassed, or altered in any
way an ignition interlock device, or attempted to do so, the facility
shall notify the appropriate authority as provided in this section.
(2) In the case of an ignition interlock device installed pursuant
to:
(a) A court order, the facility shall notify the appropriate
district probation office or the appropriate court, as applicable;
(b) An order of the Department of Motor Vehicles, the facility shall
notify the department; or
(c) An order of the Board of Pardons, the facility shall notify the
board.
(3) The facility shall also notify the county attorney of the county
in which the violation occurred.
(4) A facility shall provide the notification required by this
section when the facility becomes aware of such evidence.
(5) Failure to provide the notification required by this section is
a Class V misdemeanor.
(6) If a court receives notice that a probationer has disabled,
bypassed, or altered in any way an ignition interlock device, or
attempted to do so, the court shall immediately schedule an evidentiary
hearing to be held within fourteen days after receiving such evidence.
The court shall cause notice of the hearing to be given to the
probationer. If the probationer does not appear at the hearing and show
cause why his or her ignition interlock permit should remain in effect,
the court shall order such permit to be revoked.
Sec. 8. (1) A person who has applied for and received a 24/7
-13-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
sobriety program permit shall not:
(a) Operate a motor vehicle when the person has a concentration of
two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of the person's blood or a concentration of two-hundredths of
one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the
person's breath; or
(b) Refuse a chemical test of his or her blood, breath, or urine.
(2) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 9. (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock
Fund is created. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall administer the
fund. The fund may receive money from fees pursuant to section 60-4,115.
Money in the fund may be used for transfers to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature and as specified in section 60-6,211.05.
(2) Any money in the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 10. Section 83-1,127.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,127.02 (1) The Board of Pardons may, in its sole discretion,
when granting a reprieve to any person who has made application pursuant
to section 60-6,209, order such person to obtain an ignition interlock
permit and to operate only motor vehicles equipped with an ignition
interlock device approved by the Director of Motor Vehicles. The Board of
Pardons may order the person to hold the ignition interlock permit and
use an ignition interlock device for a period of time not to exceed any
period of revocation the applicant is subject to at the time the
application for a license reinstatement is made.
(2) Any person ordered by the Board of Pardons to operate only motor
vehicles equipped with such an ignition interlock device shall make
application to the director for the issuance of an ignition interlock
-14-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
permit pursuant to section 60-4,118.06.
(3) A person ordered by the Board of Pardons to operate only motor
vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device shall not, while such
order is in effect, operate a motor vehicle:
(a) That is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(b) That is equipped with an ignition interlock device that has been
disabled, bypassed, or altered in any way; or
(c) Without obtaining an ignition interlock permit.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, a
violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this subsection,
any such person restricted to operating a motor vehicle equipped with
such an ignition interlock device is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor if
he or she (i) operates upon the highways of this state a motor vehicle
without such an ignition interlock device, (ii) operates a motor vehicle
equipped with such an ignition interlock device which has been disabled,
bypassed, or altered in any way, or (iii) operates a motor vehicle
equipped with such an ignition interlock device without obtaining an
ignition interlock permit.
(b) A violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class IV
felony if the person operated such motor vehicle while such person had
(b) Any such person restricted to operating a motor vehicle equipped with
such an ignition interlock device is guilty of a Class IV felony if he or
she (i)(A) operates upon the highways of this state a motor vehicle
without such an ignition interlock device, (B) operates a motor vehicle
equipped with such an ignition interlock device which has been disabled,
bypassed, or altered in any way, or (C) operates a motor vehicle equipped
with such an ignition interlock device without obtaining an ignition
interlock permit and (ii) operates the motor vehicle as described in
subdivision (i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subdivision when he or she has a
concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol
-15-

LB1202 LB1202
2026 2026
per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood or a concentration of
two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of his or her breath.
(5) (4) The court shall, as a part of the judgment of conviction for
a violation described in of subdivision (4)(b) (3)(b) of this section,
order such person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a
period of fifteen years from the date ordered by the court. The court
shall also order that the operator's license of such person be revoked
for a like period. The revocation shall be administered upon sentencing,
upon the final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that
any probation is revoked.
Sec. 11. Original sections 60-6,211.11 and 83-1,127.02, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 60-497.01, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 60-4,118.06, 60-601, and
60-6,211.05, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-16-